Missouri, session 2026, HB2136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.070, to read as follows:
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of a firearm if such
person knowingly has any firearm in his or her possession and:
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, or of a
crime under the laws of any state or of the United States which, if committed within this state,
would be a felony; [or]
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is habitually in an intoxicated or drugged
condition, or is currently adjudged mentally incompetent; or
(3) Such person is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United
States.
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C felony, unless a person has been
convicted of a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a prior
conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in which case it is a class B felony.
3. The provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
the possession of an antique firearm.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.